South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5742.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 9, Title 4 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 4-9-125. A county governing body may adopt an ordinance prohibiting annexation within the county by a municipality until a comprehensive infrastructure impact study and mitigation plan has been submitted to and approved by the county governing body. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----